District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-530

Lessor’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the lessee’s default, in connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting from the default.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
This section is referenced in § 28:2A-527, § 28:2A-528, and § 28:2A-529.
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-530.

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-710.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201(2).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).